District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.13

Railroads may use Union Station and terminals.

Any railroad company lawfully existing and authorized to extend a line of railroad into the District of Columbia, or having secured the right to operate over the lines of any other then existing railroad, to a point of connection with the tracks of the Washington Terminal Company, shall have the right to the joint use of said station and terminals authorized in the Act approved February 28, 1903 (32 Stat. 909), upon the payment of a reasonable compensation for the use of the same; and if the parties be unable to agree upon such terms, then the same shall be prescribed by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, upon petition of either party in interest, under such rules of procedure as the said Court shall prescribe.

History

Feb. 28, 1903, 32 Stat. 918, ch. 856, § 11
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 109, ch. 139, § 127

Cross References

Public utilities, multiple company use of utility infrastructures, see § 34-1102.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1413.
1973 Ed., § 7-1213.